Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5899.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.25 RCW to read as follows:(1) Upon application, in a form and manner determined by the commission, the commission shall issue an initial license endorsement to practice animal chiropractic to a licensed chiropractor if the chiropractor:(a) Currently holds a valid Washington state chiropractic license;(b)(i) Provides proof of successful completion of an approved animal chiropractic educational program within the previous two years that includes a minimum of 210 curriculum hours; or(ii) Provides proof the chiropractor holds a current animal chiropractic certification; and(c) Pays fees as required by RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.(2) An animal chiropractic endorsement issued pursuant to subsection (1) of this section is valid for three years, at which time a chiropractor may apply for an endorsement renewal in a form and manner determined by the commission.(3) An animal chiropractor is eligible for renewal of their animal chiropractic license endorsement if the animal chiropractor:(a) Provides proof of a current certification from an approved animal chiropractic educational program and proof of a current animal chiropractic license endorsement;(b) Provides an attestation that the animal chiropractor has completed all continuing education requirements as required in subsection (4) of this section; and(c) Pays fees as required by RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.(4) An animal chiropractor holding an endorsement issued pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall complete at least 30 hours every three years of approved continuing education focused on animal chiropractic.(5) An animal chiropractor may practice animal chiropractic only if:(a) The animal patient has been referred to the animal chiropractor in writing by a licensed veterinarian holding a license in Washington state and who has personally examined the animal receiving the animal chiropractic care before the animal chiropractic is performed;(b) The animal chiropractor assumes liability for the quality of the animal chiropractic care performed; and(c) The animal chiropractor has received training and education related to the animal type of the animal patient.(6) An animal chiropractor may not order magnetic, roentgen, or sonographic imaging of animal patients. Animal chiropractors may engage in animal chiropractic consistent with RCW 18.25.005, including reviewing existing imaging reports of animal patients for diagnostic purposes.(7) An animal chiropractor shall encourage clients to seek veterinary care for all nonchiropractic health issues.(8) An animal chiropractor must maintain a separate written medical record of each animal patient receiving animal chiropractic care for at least five years. An animal chiropractor is required to provide a written medical record of the animal patient receiving care to the referring veterinarian within seven days of each visit by mail or electronic transmission. The record must include, without limitation:(a) The name, address, and telephone number of the client;(b) The name or identifying number, or both, of the animal patient;(c) The age, if known, sex, and breed of the animal patient;(d) The dates of care, custody, or treatment of the animal patient;(e) The results of a basic physical examination related to the animal chiropractic care provided to the animal patient;(f) The diagnosis and treatment plan related to the animal chiropractic care recommended by the animal chiropractor for the animal patient; and(g) The progress and disposition of the case.(9)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, no person shall engage in the practice of animal chiropractic, imply or represent that they engage in the practice of animal chiropractic, or offer or advertise animal chiropractic services unless they hold a current animal chiropractic license endorsement issued pursuant to this section. Only an animal chiropractor may advertise animal chiropractic services to the public using such terms that include, but are not limited to, animal chiropractor, animal chiropractic, and animal chiropractic adjustments.(b) A licensed chiropractor who is enrolled as a student in an approved animal chiropractic educational program may practice animal chiropractic as is required in the curriculum of the animal chiropractic educational program.(10)(a) Whenever a facility treats both animal and human patients on the same clinical premises, appropriate signage must be posted on the facility as established in rule by the commission.(b) Any facility offering services to both animal patients and human patients must observe all clinical and sanitary standards for veterinary facilities and chiropractic facilities required in rule, or as described in state law, or local ordinance.(11) Any animal chiropractor lawfully licensed in this state to practice animal chiropractic who reports, in good faith and in the normal course of business, a suspected incident of animal cruelty that is punishable under chapter 16.52 RCW to the proper authorities is immune from liability in any civil or criminal action brought against such animal chiropractor for reporting the suspected incident. The immunity provided in this section applies only if the animal chiropractor receives no financial benefit from the suspected incident of animal cruelty beyond charges for services rendered prior to the animal chiropractor making the initial report.(12) An animal chiropractor providing animal chiropractic care to an animal patient shall develop a protocol for notifying the veterinarian of the animal patient in the event an animal patient needs emergency care during a chiropractic appointment.(13) An animal chiropractor is responsible and accountable for services he or she provides to animal patients.(14) The commission shall share information regarding complaints or disciplinary action against an animal chiropractor with the secretary and the veterinary board of governors quarterly.(15) The commission may adopt any rules necessary to implement this section.(16) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Animal chiropractic" means the practice of chiropractic on nonhuman animals.(b) "Animal chiropractic certification" means a current certification issued by certification agencies identified by the commission in rule.(c) "Animal chiropractor" means a licensed chiropractor who holds an animal chiropractic endorsement.(d) "Animal patient" means the animal receiving the chiropractic care.(e) "Approved animal chiropractic educational program" means an animal chiropractic training program approved by the commission in rule.(f) "Client" means the person presenting the animal patient for chiropractic evaluation, care, and adjustments.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.25 RCW to read as follows:(1) The commission and the veterinary board of governors shall convene a joint task force on animal chiropractic for the purpose of reviewing complaints, investigations, and disciplinary actions related to animal chiropractic care. Membership of the joint task force shall be comprised of an equal number of representatives from the commission and the veterinary board of governors.(2) By October 30, 2030, the joint task force shall submit a report to the governor and the legislature on the animal chiropractic endorsement. The report shall include:(a) The risks to public health, quality of care, or animal welfare identified through complaints submitted to the commission, investigations conducted by the commission, and disciplinary actions taken by the commission related to animal chiropractic;(b) An assessment of the incident of veterinary denials of requests for referrals to chiropractors;(c) A review of regulatory approaches to animal chiropractic in other jurisdictions, including referral requirements and veterinary supervision; and(d) Recommendations for any changes to the rules or statutes governing the animal chiropractic endorsement.(3) This section expires July 1, 2031.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 18.92 RCW to read as follows:(1) The board shall participate in a joint task force on animal chiropractic created in section 2 of this act for the purpose of reviewing complaints, investigations, and disciplinary actions related to animal chiropractic care. Membership of the joint task force shall be comprised of an equal number of representatives from the board and the chiropractic quality assurance commission.(2) By October 30, 2030, the joint task force shall submit a report to the governor and the legislature on the animal chiropractic endorsement. The report shall include:(a) The risks to public health, quality of care, or animal welfare identified through complaints submitted to the chiropractic quality assurance commission, investigations conducted by the commission, and disciplinary actions taken by the commission related to animal chiropractic;(b) An assessment of the incident of veterinary denials of requests for referrals to chiropractors;(c) A review of regulatory approaches to animal chiropractic in other jurisdictions, including referral requirements and veterinary supervision; and(d) Recommendations for any changes to the rules or statutes governing the animal chiropractic endorsement.(3) This section expires July 1, 2031.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 18.92 RCW to read as follows:(1) A veterinarian who refers an animal patient to an animal chiropractor shall include the copy of the medical record received pursuant to section 1(8) of this act as part of the medical record of the animal patient.(2) A veterinarian who refers an animal patient to an animal chiropractor is not:(a) Required to supervise the animal chiropractor during the provision of animal chiropractic care; and(b) Liable for the animal chiropractic care provided to the animal patient by an animal chiropractor.(3) Within 14 days of denying an animal patient a referral for animal chiropractic care, a veterinarian shall provide the animal chiropractor and the client the contraindications of why the referral for animal chiropractor care was denied.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2027.--- END ---